Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.055

Employees—Applicability of merit system.

All employees of the department shall be governed by any merit system which is now or may hereafter be enacted by law governing such employment.

[ 2003 c 334 s 119; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.270. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 27. Formerly RCW 43.30.270.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.